Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-8802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Health
Insurance Exchange Navigator Registration Act:

(1) Director
means the Director of Insurance;

(2) Exchange means any health insurance
exchange established or operating in this state, including any exchange established
or operated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services;
and

(3)
Navigator means any individual or entity, other than an insurance producer
or consultant, that receives any funding, directly or indirectly, from an
exchange, the state, or the federal government to perform the duties identified
in 42 U.S.C. 18031(i)(3), as such section existed on January 1, 2013.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 2.
June 6, 2013